Maryland, session 2025, HB1449.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
21–403.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1449*

HOUSE BILL 1449
(A) [This] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THIS subtitle
applies only to milk products that are intended for sale for immediate or eventual human
consumption.
(B) THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT APPLY TO THE SALE OF RAW MILK UNDER
SUBTITLE 5 OF THIS TITLE.
21–434.
Except for sale of raw milk by a holder of a milk producer permit to a holder of a milk
processor permit [or], the sale of a farmstead cheese, OR THE SALE OF RAW MILK BY A
HOLDER OF A PERMIT ISSUED UNDER SUBTITLE 5 OF THIS TITLE, a person may not
sell raw milk for human consumption.
SUBTITLE 5. DIRECT–TO–CONSUMER SALE OF RAW MILK.
21–501.
(A) THIS SUBTITLE APPLIES ONLY TO RAW MILK SOLD DIRECTLY TO A
CONSUMER FOR HUMAN CONSUMPTION.
(B) THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT APPLY TO THE SALE OF RAW MILK BY A DAIRY
FARM WITH THREE OR FEWER COWS OR 10 OR FEWER GOATS.
21–502.
A PERSON SHALL OBTAIN A PERMIT FROM THE SECRETARY BEFORE THE
PERSON MAY SELL RAW MILK DIRECT TO A CONSUMER FOR HUMAN CONSUMPTION.
21–503.
TO QUALIFY FOR A PERMIT ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, A PERSON SHALL
COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE AND THE REGULATIONS
ADOPTED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
21–504.
(A) A PERMIT ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE EXPIRES ON THE FIRST
ANNIVERSARY OF ITS EFFECTIVE DATE, UNLESS THE PERMIT IS RENEWED FOR A
1–YEAR TERM AS PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION.
(B) BEFORE A PERMIT ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE EXPIRES, THE
HOLDER OF THE PERMIT MAY RENEW THE PERMIT FOR AN ADDITIONAL 1–YEAR
TERM IF THE HOLDER:

HOUSE BILL 1449 3
(1) IS OTHERWISE ENTITLED TO A PERMIT;
(2) PAYS TO THE SECRETARY A RENEWAL FEE EQUAL TO THE FEE FOR
AN ORIGINAL PERMIT; AND
(3) SUBMITS TO THE SECRETARY A RENEWAL APPLICATION ON THE
FORM THAT THE SECRETARY REQUIRES.
21–505.
(A) BEFORE A NEW RAW MILK PERMIT IS ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION:
(1) THE SECRETARY SHALL INSPECT THE DAIRY FARM THAT IS THE
SUBJECT OF THE RAW MILK PERMIT AND DETERMINE THAT THE DAIRY FARM IS IN
COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) THE APPLICANT SHALL HAVE A LICENSED VETERINARIAN
EXAMINE THE ANIMAL OR HERD FROM WHICH RAW MILK IS TO BE PRODUCED AND
PROVIDE THE SECRETARY WITH A WRITTEN REPORT FROM THE LICENSED
VETERINARIAN STATING THAT:
(I) ON PHYSICAL EXAMINATION, THE SUBJECT ANIMAL OR
HERD IS IN APPARENT GOOD HEALTH AND FREE FROM COMMUNICABLE DISEASES;
(II) BASED ON A BLOOD TEST, THE SUBJECT ANIMAL OR HERD
IS FREE OF BRUCELLOSIS; AND
(III) BASED ON A TEST, THE SUBJECT ANIMAL OR HERD IS FREE
OF TUBERCULOSIS;
(3) IF THE APPLICANT DOES NOT USE A PUBLIC OR MUNICIPAL WATER
SUPPLY SYSTEM, THE APPLICANT SHALL TEST THE DAIRY FARM WATER SUPPLY,
INCLUDING ANY RECIRCULATED COOLING WATER SYSTEM USED FOR MILK
COOLING, AND PROVIDE CONFIRMATION TO THE SECRETARY THAT:
(I) THE WATER SUPPLY CONTAINS A MOST PROBABLE NUMBER
OF COLIFORM ORGANISMS OF LESS THAN:
1. 2.2 PER 100 MILLILITERS BY THE MULTIPLE TUBE
FERMENTATION METHOD; OR

HOUSE BILL 1449
2. 1 PER 1000 MILLILITERS BY THE MEMBRANE FILTER
TECHNIQUE OR CHROMOGENIC SUBSTRATE TECHNIQUE;
(II) THE WATER SUPPLY IS OTHERWISE SAFE AND SANITARY;
AND
(III) ANY PLATE HEAT EXCHANGER OR TUBULAR COOLER
INSTALLED AND IN USE ON THE DAIRY FARM IS EQUIPPED WITH A BACKFLOW
PREVENTION DEVICE; AND
(4) THE APPLICANT SHALL PROVIDE DOCUMENTATION TO THE
SECRETARY OF THE APPLICANT’S ABILITY TO PRODUCE BACTERIOLOGICALLY SAFE
RAW MILK THROUGH THE PROCESS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION.
(B) (1) THE APPLICANT SHALL HAVE A SAMPLER APPROVED BY THE
DEPARTMENT DRAW THREE SEPARATE SAMPLES OF COMMINGLED MILK FROM THE
BULK TANK, DRAWN AT LEAST 7 DAYS APART AND TAKEN ON AN UNANNOUNCED
BASIS, AND SUBMIT THE SAMPLES TO A STATE–APPROVED DAIRY LABORATORY OR
TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR ANALYSIS.
(2) (I) IF A TEST OF THE FIRST OF THE THREE SAMPLES
CONCLUDES THAT NO PATHOGENIC BACTERIA ARE PRESENT, THE SECOND AND
THIRD SAMPLES DO NOT NEED TO BE TESTED AND THE RAW MILK SHALL BE
DETERMINED TO BE BACTERIOLOGICALLY SAFE.
(II) IF A SAMPLE TEST OF ANY OF THE THREE SAMPLES
CONCLUDES THAT PATHOGENIC BACTERIA ARE PRESENT, TWO SEPARATE
CONSECUTIVE TESTS FROM SAMPLES DRAWN AT LEAST 7 DAYS APART MUST
CONCLUDE THAT NO PATHOGENIC BACTERIA ARE PRESENT, AT WHICH POINT THE
RAW MILK SHALL BE DETERMINED TO BE BACTERIOLOGICALLY SAFE.
(III) IF ANY OF THE THREE SAMPLES SUBMITTED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION VIOLATE OR EXCEED THE STANDARDS OF § 21–515 OF THIS SUBTITLE,
THE APPLICANT MAY REPEAT THE PROCESS ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION
UNTIL THREE SUCCESSIVE SAMPLES MEET THE STANDARDS OF § 21–515 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, AT WHICH POINT THE RAW MILK SHALL BE DETERMINED TO BE
BACTERIOLOGICALLY SAFE.
21–506.

HOUSE BILL 1449 5
(A) THE SECRETARY MAY SUSPEND OR REVOKE A PERMIT ISSUED UNDER
THIS SUBTITLE IF THE HOLDER OF THE PERMIT HAS VIOLATED THIS SUBTITLE OR A
REGULATION ADOPTED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION,
BEFORE SUSPENDING A PERMIT ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, THE SECRETARY
SHALL GIVE NOTICE TO THE HOLDER OF THE PERMIT OF THE SECRETARY’S INTENT
TO SUSPEND THE PERMIT.
(2) THE NOTICE ISSUED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL:
(I) BE SENT BY CERTIFIED MAIL;
(II) BE SENT AT LEAST 5 DAYS BEFORE THE DATE ON WHICH THE
SECRETARY INTENDS TO SUSPEND THE PERMIT; AND
(III) PROVIDE NOTICE TO THE HOLDER OF THE PERMIT OF THE
RIGHT TO REQUEST A HEARING UNDER § 21–509 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) (1) IF THE BASIS OF SUSPENSION OR REVOCATION OF A PERMIT IS
THAT PATHOGENIC BACTERIA OR FOREIGN SUBSTANCES HAVE BEEN DETECTED IN
THE RAW MILK OR THAT THE RAW MILK POSES A THREAT TO THE HEALTH AND
SAFETY OF CONSUMERS:
(I) THE SECRETARY IS NOT REQUIRED TO GIVE NOTICE OF
INTENT TO SUSPEND THE PERMIT; AND
(II) THE SECRETARY SHALL REQUEST THAT THE HOLDER OF
THE PERMIT VOLUNTARILY CEASE ALL SALES OF RAW MILK.
(2) IF THE HOLDER OF THE PERMIT VOLUNTARILY CEASES THE SALE
OF RAW MILK FOLLOWING A REQUEST MADE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE SECRETARY SHALL CONSIDER THE VOLUNTARY CESSATION OF
THE SALE AS A MITIGATING FACTOR WHEN DETERMINING ANY PENALTY OR
SANCTION RELATED TO THE VIOLATION.
(3) IF THE HOLDER OF THE PERMIT DOES NOT VOLUNTARILY CEASE
THE SALE OF RAW MILK FOLLOWING A REQUEST MADE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II)
OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE SECRETARY SHALL:

HOUSE BILL 1449
(I) REFER THE MATTER TO THE APPROPRIATE LOCAL HEALTH
DEPARTMENT AND RECOMMEND THAT THE LOCAL HEALTH DEPARTMENT TAKE
ACTION TO CEASE THE SALE OF RAW MILK BY THE HOLDER OF THE PERMIT;
(II) CONSULT WITH THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
TO DETERMINE WHETHER THE SECRETARY SHOULD PURSUE AN INJUNCTION TO
PROHIBIT THE SALE OF RAW MILK BY THE HOLDER OF THE PERMIT;
(III) PROVIDE THE HOLDER OF THE PERMIT WITH NOTICE OF
THE RIGHT TO REQUEST A HEARING UNDER § 21–509 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(IV) SUSPEND OR REVOKE THE PERMIT OF A HOLDER WHO DOES
NOT REQUEST A HEARING UNDER § 21–509 OF THIS SUBTITLE WITHIN THE TIME
REQUIRED; AND
(V) RECOMMEND TO THE HOLDER OF THE PERMIT THAT THE
HOLDER INFORM ITS CUSTOMERS THAT THE HOLDER OF THE PERMIT HAS BEEN
REQUESTED BY THE SECRETARY TO CEASE VOLUNTARILY RAW MILK PRODUCTION
AND PROVIDE THE CUSTOMERS WITH THE BASIS OF THE SECRETARY’S REQUEST.
21–507.
(A) THE SECRETARY MAY TAKE ADMINISTRATIVE ACTION AGAINST A
HOLDER OF A PERMIT ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(B) THE SECRETARY MAY REQUEST THAT THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL OBTAIN AN INJUNCTION TO:
(1) PREVENT AN INDIVIDUAL FROM SELLING RAW MILK WITHOUT
THE PERMIT REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(2) PREVENT AN ONGOING VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE.
21–508.
(A) IF THE SECRETARY DETERMINES THAT A SUPPLY OF RAW MILK OR RAW
MILK PRODUCTS IS CONSIDERED UNSAFE OR A THREAT TO PUBLIC HEALTH, THE
SECRETARY MAY SEIZE, CONDEMN, DENATURE, OR DESTROY THE MILK OR MILK
PRODUCTS WITHOUT COMPENSATION TO THE OWNER OF THE MILK OR MILK
PRODUCTS.

HOUSE BILL 1449 7
(B) THE SECRETARY MAY PROHIBIT THE SALE OF RAW MILK OR RAW MILK
PRODUCTS IF:
(1) THE SECRETARY CONSIDERS THE RAW MILK OR RAW MILK
PRODUCTS TO BE UNSAFE OR A THREAT TO PUBLIC HEALTH; OR
(2) A HOLDER OF A PERMIT ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE VIOLATES
THIS SUBTITLE.
21–509.
(A) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS SUBTITLE AND IN THE
ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURE ACT, BEFORE THE SECRETARY DENIES AN
APPLICATION FOR A PERMIT ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, TAKES ANY ACTION
UNDER § 21–506 OF THIS SUBTITLE, OR REJECTS A LABEL SUBMITTED UNDER §
21–518(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE SECRETARY SHALL GIVE THE PERSON AGAINST
WHOM THE ACTION IS CONTEMPLATED AN OPPORTUNITY FOR A HEARING BEFORE
THE SECRETARY.
(B) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION, THE SECRETARY
SHALL GIVE NOTICE AND HOLD THE HEARING IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURE ACT.
(C) (1) WITHIN 48 HOURS AFTER THE PERSON RECEIVES NOTICE OF THE
SECRETARY’S ACTION UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A PERSON WHOSE
PERMIT HAS BEEN SUSPENDED OR WHO HAS RECEIVED A NOTICE THAT THE
SECRETARY INTENDS TO SUSPEND THE PERMIT MAY REQUEST A HEARING WITH THE
SECRETARY.
(2) THE SECRETARY SHALL HOLD THE HEARING WITHIN 72 HOURS
AFTER RECEIVING THE REQUEST FOR A HEARING.
(D) IF AFTER DUE NOTICE THE PERSON FOR WHOM THE HEARING IS HELD
FAILS OR REFUSES TO APPEAR, THE SECRETARY MAY HEAR AND DETERMINE THE
MATTER WITHOUT THE PERSON BEING PRESENT.
(E) A PERSON AGGRIEVED BY A FINAL DECISION OF THE SECRETARY IN A
CONTESTED CASE, AS DEFINED BY THE ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURE ACT, MAY
TAKE A DIRECT JUDICIAL APPEAL.
21–510.

HOUSE BILL 1449
A HOLDER OF A PERMIT ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE SHALL ALLOW THE
SECRETARY TO INSPECT THE DAIRY FARM THAT IS THE SUBJECT OF THE PERMIT,
REVIEW RECORDS, DRAW SAMPLES, CONDUCT TESTS, AND TAKE ANY OTHER ACTION
NECESSARY TO THE PERFORMANCE OF THE SECRETARY’S DUTIES UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE.
21–511.
(A) A PERSON MAY NOT SELL OR OFFER FOR SALE RAW MILK AFTER THE
SELL–BY DATE PRINTED ON THE CAP OR CONTAINER OF THE RAW MILK.
(B) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, THE
SELL–BY DATE MAY NOT BE LATER THAN 17 DAYS AFTER THE DAY IMMEDIATELY
FOLLOWING THE DATE ON WHICH THE RAW MILK WAS PRODUCED.
(C) (1) THE SECRETARY SHALL SAMPLE CONTAINERS OF RAW MILK FOR
HUMAN CONSUMPTION IN POSSESSION OF A HOLDER OF A PERMIT ISSUED UNDER
THIS SUBTITLE BEFORE THE DELIVERY OF RAW MILK TO A CONSUMER AT LEAST
ONCE EACH CALENDAR YEAR.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT OR A DAIRY LABORATORY APPROVED BY THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL ANALYZE EACH SAMPLE TAKEN UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION TO DETERMINE COMPLIANCE WITH THE BACTERIOLOGICAL
REQUIREMENTS OF § 21–515 OF THIS SUBTITLE BEFORE THE EXPIRATION DATE
LABELED ON THE RAW MILK CONTAINER.
(3) (I) IF TWO OR MORE SAMPLES TAKEN UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION EXCEED THE LIMITS ESTABLISHED UNDER § 21–515 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, THE SECRETARY SHALL REQUIRE THE HOLDER OF THE PERMIT TO USE A
SHORTENED SELL–BY PERIOD AS DETERMINED BY THE SECRETARY.
(II) THE SECRETARY SHALL DETERMINE A SHORTENED
SELL–BY PERIOD REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH BY
CALCULATING THE PERIOD IN WHICH THE BACTERIAL GROWTH IN THE RAW MILK
WILL NOT EXCEED THE REQUIREMENTS OF § 21–515 OF THIS SUBTITLE IF THE RAW
MILK IS MAINTAINED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE TEMPERATURE REQUIREMENTS OF
§ 21–514 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(III) IF A HOLDER OF A PERMIT IS REQUIRED TO USE A
SHORTENED SELL–BY PERIOD UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
HOLDER MAY:

HOUSE BILL 1449 9
1. SUBMIT SAMPLES TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR
ANALYSIS TO DETERMINE WHETHER THE RAW MILK SAMPLE COMPLIES WITH THE
BACTERIOLOGICAL REQUIREMENTS OF § 21–515 OF THIS SUBTITLE DURING THE
SELL–BY PERIOD ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION; AND
2. RESUME USING THE SELL–BY PERIOD ESTABLISHED
UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION ON APPROVAL OF THE SECRETARY.
21–512.
(A) EACH HOLDER OF A PERMIT ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE SHALL
MONITOR THE HEALTH OF THE ANIMAL OR HERD FROM WHICH THE RAW MILK FOR
HUMAN CONSUMPTION IS PRODUCED TO ENSURE THAT THE ANIMAL OR HERD IS IN
GENERAL GOOD HEALTH AND FREE FROM BRUCELLOSIS AND TUBERCULOSIS.
(B) AT LEAST EVERY 13 MONTHS, EACH HOLDER OF A PERMIT SHALL
PROVIDE THE SECRETARY WITH CONFIRMATION FROM A LICENSED VETERINARIAN
THAT THE ANIMAL OR HERD FROM WHICH THE RAW MILK IS PRODUCED HAS BEEN
DETERMINED TO BE FREE FROM BRUCELLOSIS BY AN ANNUAL BLOOD TEST AND
TUBERCULOSIS BY AN ANNUAL TEST.
(C) (1) AT LEAST ONCE EACH YEAR, EACH HOLDER OF A PERMIT SHALL
HAVE A LICENSED VETERINARIAN EXAMINE THE ANIMAL OR HERD FROM WHICH RAW
MILK IS PRODUCED AND ISSUE A WRITTEN REPORT OF THE EXAMINATION STATING
THAT THE SUBJECT ANIMAL OR HERD IS IN GENERAL GOOD HEALTH AND FREE FROM
COMMUNICABLE DISEASE.
(2) THE HOLDER OF A PERMIT SHALL RETAIN A COPY OF THE REPORT
REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION FOR AT LEAST 3 YEARS AND
MAKE THE REPORT AVAILABLE FOR INSPECTION BY THE SECRETARY ON REQUEST.
21–513.
(A) EACH HOLDER OF A PERMIT ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE SHALL
ENSURE THAT THE WATER SUPPLY, INCLUDING RECIRCULATED COOLING WATER,
FOR THE DAIRY FARM OPERATION IS SAFE AND SANITARY.
(B) (1) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A DAIRY FARM THAT USES
A PUBLIC OR MUNICIPAL WATER SYSTEM.
(2) THE WATER SUPPLY FOR A DAIRY FARM PRODUCING RAW MILK
FOR HUMAN CONSUMPTION SHALL BE TESTED AT THE EXPENSE OF THE HOLDER OF
THE PERMIT:

HOUSE BILL 1449
(I) AT LEAST ONCE EVERY 6 MONTHS; AND
(II) WHENEVER A REPAIR OR AN ALTERATION IS MADE TO THE
WATER SUPPLY SYSTEM.
(3) THE HOLDER OF A PERMIT SHALL RETAIN A RECORD OF THE
TESTING CONDUCTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION FOR AT LEAST 1
YEAR AND MAKE THE RECORD AVAILABLE FOR INSPECTION BY THE SECRETARY ON
REQUEST.
(4) A PLATE HEAT EXCHANGER OR TUBULAR COOLER INSTALLED AND
IN USE ON A DAIRY FARM SHALL BE EQUIPPED WITH A BACKFLOW PREVENTION
DEVICE.
21–514.
(A) RAW MILK SHALL BE COOLED TO 40 DEGREES FAHRENHEIT OR LESS
WITHIN 2 HOURS AFTER MILKING.
(B) THE BLEND TEMPERATURE AFTER THE FIRST AND SUBSEQUENT
MILKINGS MAY NOT EXCEED 50 DEGREES FAHRENHEIT.
21–515.
(A) AT LEAST TWICE EACH MONTH, EACH HOLDER OF A PERMIT ISSUED
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE SHALL CONDUCT TESTING OF THE RAW MILK TO
DEMONSTRATE THAT:
(1) THE BACTERIAL COUNT IN THE RAW MILK DOES NOT EXCEED
20,000 PER MILLILITER;
(2) THE COLIFORM COUNT IN THE RAW MILK DOES NOT EXCEED 10
PER MILLILITER;
(3) THE SOMATIC CELL COUNT IN THE RAW MILK DOES NOT EXCEED
750,000 PER MILLILITER FOR COW’S MILK OR 1,500,000 PER MILLILITER FOR
GOAT’S MILK; AND
(4) THERE ARE NO POSITIVE RESULTS FOR DRUG RESIDUE IN THE
RAW MILK, USING DRUG RESIDUE DETECTION LABORATORY TECHNIQUES
REFERENCED IN THE MOST RECENT GRADE “A” PASTEURIZED MILK ORDINANCE
DEVELOPED BY THE FEDERAL FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION.

HOUSE BILL 1449 11
(B) AT LEAST EVERY 6 MONTHS, EACH HOLDER OF A PERMIT SHALL
CONDUCT TESTING OF THE RAW MILK FROM A SAMPLE DRAWN FROM THE BULK
TANK TO DEMONSTRATE THAT NO SALMONELLAE, LISTERIA MONOCYTOGENES,
CAMPYLOBACTER, OR E. COLI BACTERIA ARE PRESENT.
(C) THE TESTING CONDUCTED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONDUCTED
AT A LABORATORY OPERATED OR APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
21–516.
(A) (1) IF TWO OF THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING FOUR RAW MILK
SAMPLES TESTED UNDER § 21–515 OF THIS SUBTITLE ARE NOT IN COMPLIANCE
WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF § 21–514 OR § 21–515 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE
SECRETARY SHALL PROVIDE THE HOLDER OF A PERMIT ISSUED UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE WITH WRITTEN NOTICE THAT THE HOLDER OF THE PERMIT IS IN
VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) IF THREE OF THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING FIVE RAW MILK
SAMPLES TESTED UNDER § 21–515 OF THIS SUBTITLE ARE NOT IN COMPLIANCE
WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF § 21–514 OR § 21–515 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE
SECRETARY SHALL SUSPEND OR REVOKE THE RAW MILK PERMIT.
(B) IF A RAW MILK SAMPLE TESTS POSITIVE FOR THE PRESENCE OF A
PESTICIDE AT OR ABOVE ACTIONABLE LEVELS ESTABLISHED FOR THE PESTICIDE BY
THE U.S. ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY, THE HOLDER OF A PERMIT
ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE SHALL:
(1) IMMEDIATELY CEASE THE SALE OF RAW MILK;
(2) INVESTIGATE AND DETERMINE THE CAUSE OF THE
CONTAMINATION, REPORT THE RESULT OF THE INVESTIGATION TO THE
SECRETARY, AND CORRECT THE CAUSE OF THE CONTAMINATION; AND
(3) REFRAIN FROM SELLING RAW MILK UNTIL:
(I) TESTING SHOWS THE SAMPLE TO BE FREE OF PESTICIDE
RESIDUE OR BELOW ACTIONABLE LEVELS ESTABLISHED FOR THE RESIDUE BY THE
U.S. ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY;
(II) THE HOLDER OF THE PERMIT SUBMITS THE TEST RESULTS
REQUIRED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS ITEM TO THE SECRETARY; AND

HOUSE BILL 1449
(III) THE SECRETARY APPROVES THE RESUMPTION OF RAW
MILK SALES.
(C) IF A RAW MILK SAMPLE TESTS POSITIVE FOR THE PRESENCE OF A DRUG,
THE HOLDER OF A PERMIT ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE SHALL:
(1) IMMEDIATELY CEASE THE SALE OF RAW MILK;
(2) INVESTIGATE AND DETERMINE THE CAUSE OF THE
CONTAMINATION, REPORT THE RESULT OF THE INVESTIGATION TO THE
SECRETARY, AND CORRECT THE CAUSE OF THE CONTAMINATION; AND
(3) REFRAIN FROM SELLING RAW MILK UNTIL:
(I) A SAMPLE COLLECTED BY AN APPROVED SAMPLER AND
TESTED AT A LABORATORY APPROVED BY THE SECRETARY SHOWS THE SAMPLE TO
BE FREE OF DRUG RESIDUE;
(II) THE HOLDER OF THE PERMIT SUBMITS THE TEST RESULTS
REQUIRED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS ITEM TO THE SECRETARY; AND
(III) THE SECRETARY APPROVES THE RESUMPTION OF RAW
MILK SALES.
(D) IF A RAW MILK SAMPLE TESTS POSITIVE FOR THE PRESENCE OF
SALMONELLAE, LISTERIA MONOCYTOGENES, CAMPYLOBACTER, OR E. COLI
BACTERIA, THE HOLDER OF A PERMIT ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE SHALL:
(1) IMMEDIATELY CEASE THE SALE OF RAW MILK;
(2) INVESTIGATE AND DETERMINE THE CAUSE OF THE
CONTAMINATION, REPORT THE RESULT OF THE INVESTIGATION TO THE
SECRETARY, AND CORRECT THE CAUSE OF THE CONTAMINATION; AND
(3) REFRAIN FROM SELLING RAW MILK UNTIL:
(I) TWO CONSECUTIVE SAMPLES, TAKEN AT LEAST 2 DAYS
AFTER THE CESSATION OF RAW MILK SALES AND AT LEAST 2 DAYS AFTER ANY
PREVIOUS SAMPLE, COLLECTED BY AN APPROVED SAMPLER AND TESTED AT A
LABORATORY APPROVED BY THE SECRETARY SHOW THE SAMPLES TO BE FREE OF
SALMONELLAE, LISTERIA MONOCYTOGENES, CAMPYLOBACTER, OR E. COLI
BACTERIA;

HOUSE BILL 1449 13
(II) THE HOLDER OF THE PERMIT SUBMITS THE TEST RESULTS
REQUIRED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS ITEM TO THE SECRETARY; AND
(III) THE SECRETARY APPROVES THE RESUMPTION OF RAW
MILK SALES.
21–517.
(A) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY WITH RESPECT TO RAW MILK
THAT IS PACKAGED FOR SALE OR DELIVERY AT A LOCATION OTHER THAN THE FARM
WHERE THE RAW MILK IS PRODUCED.
(2) THE HOLDER OF A PERMIT ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE SHALL
CONDUCT THE BOTTLING AND CAPPING, OR THE FILLING AND CLOSURE OF
CONTAINERS OTHER THAN BOTTLES, IN A ROOM SEPARATE FROM THE MILK ROOM
BY A MECHANICAL MEANS OF FILLING AND CAPPING BOTTLES OR BY A MECHANICAL
MEANS OF THE FILLING AND CLOSURE OF CONTAINERS AND OTHER BOTTLES; AND
(3) THE CLOSURE OF THE CONTAINER MUST PROTECT THE POURING
LIP TO ITS LARGEST DIAMETER.
(B) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY WITH RESPECT TO RAW MILK
THAT IS PACKAGED FOR DELIVERY AT THE LOCATION WHERE THE RAW MILK IS
PRODUCED.
(2) THE HOLDER OF A PERMIT ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE MAY
BOTTLE AND CAP RAW MILK OR FILL AND CLOSE RAW MILK IN CONTAINERS OTHER
THAN BOTTLES IN A MILK ROOM FACILITY.
(3) THE HOLDER OF A PERMIT ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE SHALL
COMPLETE BOTTLING AND CAPPING OR FILLING AND CLOSURE IN A SANITARY
MANNER USING EASILY CLEANABLE EQUIPMENT THAT HAS BEEN CLEANED AND
SANITIZED.
(C) A CONTAINER FOR RAW MILK:
(1) SHALL BE FILLED AND CLOSED WITHOUT ANY PART OF A HAND
COMING INTO CONTACT WITH THE INNER SURFACE OF THE BOTTLE OR CONTAINER
OR IN CONTACT WITH BOTTLE CAPS;
(2) SHALL BE STORED IN A CLEAN AND DRY AREA THAT IS OFF THE
FLOOR AND PROTECTED FROM ANY SOURCE OF CONTAMINATION; AND

HOUSE BILL 1449
(3) MAY NOT BE FILLED BY THE CONSUMER.
(D) THE HOLDER OF A PERMIT ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE SHALL
OBTAIN AND KEEP BOTTLE CAPS FOR RAW MILK CONTAINERS IN SANITARY
CONTAINERS.
(E) THE HOLDER OF A PERMIT ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE SHALL
CONDUCT THE WASHING OF RETURNABLE BOTTLES OR CONTAINERS FOR RAW MILK
IN A ROOM THAT IS SEPARATE FROM ANY ROOM THAT IS DEVOTED TO BOTTLING AND
CAPPING OR THE FILLING AND CLOSURE OF CONTAINERS OTHER THAN BOTTLES.
21–518.
(A) (1) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY WITH RESPECT TO RAW MILK
PACKAGED FOR SALE IN CONTAINERS OWNED BY THE CONSUMER.
(2) THE LABELING OF RAW MILK CONTAINERS AND CAPS USED ON
PREPACKAGED CONTAINERS MUST BE APPROVED BY THE SECRETARY BEFORE
SALE.
(3) TO BE APPROVED BY THE SECRETARY, A LABEL:
(I) MUST CLEARLY LABEL THE PRODUCT AS RAW MILK;
(II) MUST INCLUDE THE FLUID VOLUME OF THE RAW MILK;
(III) MUST INCLUDE THE NAME AND ADDRESS OF THE
DISTRIBUTOR OR PRODUCER;
(IV) MUST STATE THAT THE PRODUCT IS TO BE REFRIGERATED;
(V) MUST INCLUDE A CONSUMER ADVISORY STATEMENT THAT
IS SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR TO THE FOLLOWING STATEMENT:
“RAW MILK HAS NOT BEEN PROCESSED TO REMOVE PATHOGENS THAT CAUSE
ILLNESS. THE CONSUMPTION OF RAW MILK MAY SIGNIFICANTLY INCREASE THE
RISK OF FOODBORNE ILLNESS IN INDIVIDUALS WHO CONSUME IT – PARTICULARLY
WITH RESPECT TO CERTAIN HIGHLY SUSCEPTIBLE POPULATIONS SUCH AS
PRESCHOOL–AGED CHILDREN, OLDER ADULTS, PREGNANT WOMEN, INDIVIDUALS
EXPERIENCING ILLNESS, AND OTHER INDIVIDUALS WITH WEAKENED IMMUNE
SYSTEMS.”; AND
(VI) MAY NOT CONTAIN FALSE OR MISLEADING STATEMENTS.

HOUSE BILL 1449 15
(4) WITHIN 10 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER RECEIVING A COMPLETE
APPLICATION FOR LABEL APPROVAL UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THE SECRETARY SHALL ISSUE A WRITTEN APPROVAL OR DENIAL TO THE HOLDER
OF A PERMIT ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(5) (I) THE SECRETARY SHALL ASSIGN A LABEL APPROVED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION A UNIQUE SERIAL NUMBER AND PROVIDE THE
UNIQUE SERIAL NUMBER TO THE HOLDER OF A PERMIT ISSUED UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE, ALONG WITH A COPY OF THE LABEL, IN THE WRITTEN APPROVAL.
(II) THE SECRETARY SHALL RETAIN A COPY OF EACH WRITTEN
APPROVAL ISSUED UNDER PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(6) A DENIAL ISSUED UNDER PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL:
(I) STATE THE REASONS FOR THE DENIAL; AND
(II) PROVIDE NOTICE TO THE HOLDER OF THE PERMIT OF THE
RIGHT TO AN ADMINISTRATIVE HEARING UNDER § 21–509 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) A RAW MILK CONTAINER OR THE CAP OF A RAW MILK CONTAINER
SHALL CLEARLY INDICATE A SELL–BY DATE AFTER WHICH THE RAW MILK MAY NOT
BE SOLD OR OFFERED FOR SALE.
(2) THE SELL–BY DATE PRINTED ON THE CAP OR CONTAINER OF RAW
MILK SHALL BE:
(I) PRECEDED BY THE WORDS “SELL BY” OR “NOT TO BE SOLD
AFTER” OR THE STATEMENT “NOT TO BE SOLD AFTER THE DATE STAMPED ABOVE”;
(II) CONSPICUOUSLY AND LEGIBLY MARKED IN A CONTRASTING
COLOR; AND
(III) SEPARATE AND DISTINCT FROM ANY OTHER NUMBER,
LETTER, OR INTERVENING MATERIAL ON THE CAP OR CONTAINER.
21–519.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY WITH RESPECT TO RAW MILK PACKAGED
FOR SALE IN CONTAINERS OWNED BY THE CONSUMER.

HOUSE BILL 1449
(B) A HOLDER OF A PERMIT ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE SHALL POST A
CONSUMER ADVISORY STATEMENT THAT SHALL BE SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR TO THE
FOLLOWING STATEMENT:
“RAW MILK HAS NOT BEEN PROCESSED TO REMOVE PATHOGENS THAT CAUSE
ILLNESS. THE CONSUMPTION OF RAW MILK MAY SIGNIFICANTLY INCREASE THE
RISK OF FOODBORNE ILLNESS IN INDIVIDUALS WHO CONSUME IT – PARTICULARLY
WITH RESPECT TO CERTAIN HIGHLY SUSCEPTIBLE POPULATIONS SUCH AS
PRESCHOOL–AGED CHILDREN, OLDER ADULTS, PREGNANT WOMEN, INDIVIDUALS
EXPERIENCING ILLNESS, AND OTHER INDIVIDUALS WITH WEAKENED IMMUNE
SYSTEMS.”.
21–520.
THE SECRETARY MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.